Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2231
Disciplinary actions; limitations imposed by compact.

(1) In order to effectuate the transition into compact administration, the board shall require all licensees entering into or becoming subject to an order of probation or other disciplinary action that limits practice or requires monitoring to agree, as of the date of the order, not to practice in any other state which is a party to the Nurse Licensure Compact during the term of such probation or disciplinary action without prior authorization from the other party state.

(2) Any licensee subject to disciplinary action, such as revocation, suspension, probation, or any other action which affects a licensee's authorization to practice, on the effective date of entering the compact, is not entitled to a multistate license privilege while such disciplinary action is in effect unless practice in another state is authorized by this state and any other state in which the licensee wishes to practice.

Laws 2000, LB 523, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.38;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 787.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.